test/tools/tokenize-backtrack.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+N
+Prop
+V
+Abbr
+PUNCT
@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@
@PMATCH_BACKTRACK@
+ErrSpace
%#
+Adv
+Num
+Prn
+Cmp

LEXICON Root

skuvla+N:skuvla #;
busse+N:busse #;
busset+V:busse #;
< {skuvla} "@PMATCH_BACKTRACK@":0 "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":" " {busse} "+N":0 "+ErrSpace":0 > # ;

logi+Num:logi #;
guokte+Num:guokte #;
njeallje+Num:njeallje #;
lo+Cmp#:lo GI;
lo+Num:lo UNSPACEGI;
! Silly example, but just to test that spaces on both sides work, as well as multiple backtracking points:
< {njeallje} "@PMATCH_BACKTRACK@":0 "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":" " 0:" " 0:" " {logi} "@PMATCH_BACKTRACK@":0 "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":" " {guokte} "+Num":0 "+ErrSpace":0 > # ;

Jan+N+Prop:Jan #;
.+PUNCT:. #;
Jan DOTABBR;

su+Prn:su #;
su+Adv+Abbr:su DOTNOTAG;


LEXICON DOTABBR
! This one should create a new backtrack-point before the dot, but *no* sub-reading:
< "@PMATCH_BACKTRACK@":0 "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":0 {.}   "+N":0 "+Abbr":0 > # ;
! This one should create a new backtrack-point before the dot, *as well as* a sub-reading:
< "@PMATCH_BACKTRACK@":0 "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":0 {.}:0 "+N":0 "+Abbr":0 "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":0 {.} "+PUNCT":0 > # ;

! Want:
!"<Jan.>"
!	"." PUNCT "<.>"
!		"Jan." N Abbr "<Jan>"
!	"Jan." N Abbr
!	"." PUNCT "<.>"
!		"Jan" N Prop "<Jan>"

LEXICON DOTNOTAG
! As the sub-reading-line of DOTABBR, but the two input-marks are right next to each other:
< "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":0 "@PMATCH_BACKTRACK@":0 "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":0 {.} "+PUNCT":0 > # ;
! TODO: This doesn't give the sub-reading, however; should it?
!< "@PMATCH_BACKTRACK@":0 "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":0 "@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@":0 {.} "+PUNCT":0 > # ;


LEXICON UNSPACEGI
@PMATCH_INPUT_MARK@:0 GI;

LEXICON GI
gi+N:gi #;
